Maryland, session 2025, SB0763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
20–401.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0763*

SENATE BILL 763
(b) (1) “Hotel” means an establishment that offers sleeping accommodations
for compensation.
(2) “Hotel” includes:
(i) an apartment;
(ii) a cottage;
(iii) a hostelry;
(iv) an inn;
(v) a motel;
(vi) a rooming house; or
(vii) a tourist home.
(3) IN GARRETT COUNTY, “HOTEL” INCLUDES A TRANSIENT
VACATION RENTAL UNIT.
(c) “Hotel rental tax” means the tax on a transient charge.
(D) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL PLATFORM” MEANS A SERVICE PROVIDED ON
THE INTERNET THAT ADVERTISES HOTELS AND RECEIVES COMPENSATION FOR
MANAGING RESERVATIONS ON BEHALF OF THE HOTEL.
[(d)] (E) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of
this paragraph, “transient charge” means a hotel charge for sleeping accommodations for a
period not exceeding 4 consecutive months.
(ii) In Carroll County, “transient charge” means a hotel charge for
sleeping accommodations for a period not exceeding 25 days.
(iii) In Frederick County, “transient charge” means a hotel charge for
sleeping accommodations for a period not exceeding 90 days.
(iv) In Garrett County and Washington County, “transient charge”
means a hotel charge for sleeping accommodations for a period not exceeding 30 days.
(2) “Transient charge” does not include any hotel charge for:
(i) services; or
(ii) accommodations other than sleeping accommodations.

SENATE BILL 763 3
(F) “TRANSIENT VACATION RENTAL UNIT” MEANS A SINGLE BUILDING THAT
OFFERS COMPLETE LIVING ACCOMMODATIONS AND A MAXIMUM OF EIGHT
BEDROOMS WITH A MAXIMUM OVERNIGHT OCCUPANCY OF TWO INDIVIDUALS PER
ROOM AND AN ADDITIONAL FOUR INDIVIDUALS.
[(e)] (G) “Western Maryland code county” means a code county in the Western
Maryland class as established under § 9–302 of this article.
20–405.1.
IN GARRETT COUNTY, A SHORT–TERM RENTAL PLATFORM OR A MANAGER, AN
AGENT, OR ANY OTHER PERSON ENGAGED BY AN OWNER OF A HOTEL TO FACILITATE
RENTAL OF THE HOTEL AND TAKE PAYMENT OF A TRANSIENT CHARGE SHALL, ON
BEHALF OF THE OWNER OF THE HOTEL:
(1) PERFORM ALL DUTIES RELATED TO COLLECTING AND REMITTING
THE HOTEL RENTAL TAX AND PERFORM OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE FUNCTIONS
REQUIRED OF A HOTEL UNDER THIS PART; AND
(2) BE SUBJECT TO PENALTIES THAT APPLY TO A HOTEL FOR FAILURE
TO COMPLY WITH THIS PART.
20–425.
(a) If a hotel fails to pay the hotel rental tax as required under this part, the hotel
shall pay interest on the unpaid tax from the date on which the hotel is required to pay the
tax to the date that the tax is paid.
(b) The interest rate for each month or fraction of a month is:
(1) for Cecil County, Dorchester County, GARRETT COUNTY, Talbot
County, Washington County, and Wicomico County, 1%; and
(2) for any other county, 0.5%.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.